Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.120

Extortion in the first degree.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) A person is guilty of extortion in the first degree if he or she commits extortion by means of a threat as defined in *RCW 9A.04.110(27) (a), (b), or (c).

(2) Extortion in the first degree is a class B felony.

[2011 c 336 s 377; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.120.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 9A.04.110 was amended by 2011 c 166 s 2, changing subsection (27) to subsection (28).